Maine, session 132, LD1565.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §13107, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is amended to read:
A person may not operate any 4-wheel-drive vehicle, dune buggy, all-terrain vehicle,
motorcycle or any other motor vehicle, other than a snowmobile and appurtenant
equipment or an ATV equipped with snow tracks registered with an endorsement sticker
purchased pursuant to section 13155, subsection 13, on snowmobile trails that are financed
in whole or in part with funds from the Snowmobile Trail Fund, unless that use has been
authorized by the landowner or the landowner's agent, or unless the use is necessitated by
an emergency involving safety of persons or property.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §13155, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Endorsement stickers. When registering an ATV in accordance with subsection
3, the commissioner, or an agent designated by the commissioner, may issue an
endorsement to an ATV registration that authorizes a person to operate the person's ATV
on snowmobile trails in the State if the ATV is equipped with snow tracks. The
commissioner shall charge a fee of $25 for the endorsement in the form of stickers that
must be affixed to the front and rear of the ATV next to the registration number.